Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5050.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17744a. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, a prescriber may issue a prescription for and a dispensing prescriber or pharmacist may dispense auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system to an authorized entity. When issuing a prescription for or dispensing auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system to an authorized entity as authorized under this section, the prescriber, dispensing prescriber, or pharmacist, as appropriate, shall insert the name of the authorized entity as the name of the patient. (2) A school employee who is a licensed registered professional nurse or who is trained in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system under section 1179a of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1179a, may possess and administer an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system dispensed to a school board under this section.an authorized entity as defined in subsection (6)(a)(i). (3) An authorized entity as defined in subsection (6)(b) (6)(a)(ii) may acquire and stock a supply of auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system under a prescription as authorized in this section. An authorized entity as defined in subsection (6)(b) (6)(a)(ii) that acquires and stocks a supply of auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system is subject to section 17744d. (4) A law enforcement officer or firefighter of an authorized entity as defined in subsection (6)(c) (6)(a)(iii) may, subject to section 2 of the law enforcement and firefighter access to epinephrine act, 2020 PA 312, MCL 28.822, possess and administer auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system dispensed to the entity under this section. (5) A prescriber who issues a prescription for or a dispensing prescriber or pharmacist who dispenses auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system to an authorized entity as authorized under this section is not liable in a civil action for a properly stored and dispensed epinephrine auto-injector delivery system that was a proximate cause of injury or death to an individual due to the administration of or failure to administer the epinephrine auto-injector.delivery system. (6) As used in this section: , "authorized (a) "Authorized entity" means any of the following: (i) (a) A school board for the purpose of meeting the requirements of section 1179a of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1179a. (ii) (b) A person or governmental entity that operates or conducts a business or activity at which allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis may be present, including, but not limited to, a recreation camp, youth sports league, amusement park, nonpublic school, religious institution, or sports arena. (iii) (c) An eligible entity authorized to purchase, possess, and distribute auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system under the law enforcement and firefighter access to epinephrine act, 2020 PA 312, MCL 28.821 to 28.823. (b) "Epinephrine delivery system" includes, but is not limited to, an epinephrine auto-injector, an epinephrine inhaler, or epinephrine nasal spray. Sec. 17744d. (1) This section only applies to an authorized entity as defined in section 17744a(6)(b) 17744a(6)(a)(ii) that acquires and stocks a supply of auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system as authorized in section 17744a. An authorized entity shall store auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system in a location readily accessible in an emergency and in accordance with the auto-injectable epinephrine's epinephrine delivery system's instructions for use and any additional requirements that are established by the department. An authorized entity shall designate an employee or agent who has completed the training required under this section to be responsible for the storage, maintenance, and general oversight of the auto-injectable epinephrine delivery system acquired by the authorized entity. (2) An employee or agent of an authorized entity or other individual, which employee, agent, or individual has completed the training required under this section, may, on the premises of or in connection with the conduct of the business or activity of the authorized entity, use auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system prescribed under section 17744a to do any of the following: (a) Provide auto-injectable the epinephrine delivery system to an individual who the employee, agent, or other individual believes in good faith is experiencing anaphylaxis for immediate self-administration, regardless of whether the individual has a prescription for auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system or has previously been diagnosed with an allergy. (b) Administer auto-injectable the epinephrine delivery system to an individual who the employee, agent, or other individual believes in good faith is experiencing anaphylaxis, regardless of whether the individual has a prescription for auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system or has previously been diagnosed with an allergy. (3) Before providing or administering auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system made available by an authorized entity, an employee, agent, or other individual described in subsection (2) must complete an initial anaphylaxis training program and a subsequent anaphylaxis training program at least every 2 years following completion of the most recently completed anaphylaxis training program that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is conducted by a nationally recognized organization experienced in training laypersons in emergency health treatment or by a person, entity, or class of individuals approved by the department. (b) Is conducted online or in person. (c) At a minimum, covers all of the following: (i) Techniques on how to recognize symptoms of severe allergic reactions, including anaphylaxis. (ii) Standards and procedures for the storage and administration of auto-injectable epinephrine delivery systems. (iii) Emergency follow-up procedures. (4) An organization, person, entity, or class of individuals that conducts an anaphylaxis training program described in subsection (3) shall issue a certificate, on a form developed or approved by the department, to each individual who successfully completes the anaphylaxis training program. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an authorized entity and its employees, agents, and other trained individuals that have acted in accordance with the requirements of subsections (1) to (4); an individual who uses auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system obtained in accordance with the requirements of subsections (1) to (4) and made available under subsection (10); or an organization, person, entity, or class of individuals that conducts an anaphylaxis training program described in and conducted in accordance with subsection (3), is not subject to any of the following: (a) For an authorized entity or person other than an individual described in this subsection, civil liability for injury, death, or damages that result from the administration or self-administration of auto-injectable the epinephrine delivery system, the failure to administer auto-injectable the epinephrine delivery system, or any other act or omission taken pursuant to this section, if the conduct does not constitute gross negligence as that term is defined in section 7 of 1964 PA 170, MCL 691.1407, that is the proximate cause of the injury, death, or damages. (b) For an individual described in this subsection, civil liability for injury, death, or damages that result from the administration or self-administration of auto-injectable the epinephrine delivery system, the failure to administer auto-injectable the epinephrine delivery system, or any other act or omission taken pursuant to this section, if the conduct does not constitute willful or wanton misconduct that is the proximate cause of the injury, death, or damages. (c) For an authorized entity or person including an individual described in this subsection, criminal prosecution for purchasing, possessing, or distributing auto-injectable the epinephrine delivery system, the administration or self-administration of auto-injectable the epinephrine delivery system, the failure to administer auto-injectable the epinephrine delivery system, or any other act or omission taken pursuant to this section. (6) The administration of auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system as authorized in this section is not the practice of medicine. (7) This section does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that may be available under the laws of this state. (8) An authorized entity located in this state is not civilly liable for any injuries or related damages that result from providing or administering auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system by its employees or agents outside of this state if either of the following requirements is met: (a) The authorized entity or its employee or agent would not have been civilly liable for the injuries or related damages had the provision or administration occurred in this state. (b) The authorized entity or its employee or agent is not civilly liable for the injuries or related damages under the law of the state in which the provision or administration occurred. (9) An authorized entity shall submit to the department, on a form prescribed by the department, a report of each incident on the premises of or in connection with the conduct of the business or activity of the authorized entity that involves the administration of auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system. The department shall annually publish a report that summarizes and analyzes all reports submitted to it under this subsection. (10) An authorized entity may make auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system available to an individual other than an employee, agent, or individual described in subsection (2), and the other individual may administer auto-injectable an epinephrine delivery system to any individual he or she the other individual believes in good faith to be experiencing anaphylaxis, if the auto-injectable epinephrine delivery system is stored in a locked, secure container and is made available only upon remote authorization by an authorized health care provider after consultation with the authorized health care provider by audio, televideo, or other similar means of electronic communication. Consultation with an authorized health care provider for the purpose of this subsection is not the practice of telemedicine and does not violate any law or rule regulating the authorized health care provider's scope of practice. As used in this subsection, "authorized health care provider" means a prescriber as that term is defined in section 17708 other than a licensed dentist, licensed optometrist, or licensed veterinarian. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5054 (request no. H02192'25). (b) House Bill No. 5049 (request no. H02193'25). (c) House Bill No. 5051 (request no. H02911'25). (d) House Bill No. 5052 (request no. H03174'25). (e) House Bill No. 5053 (request no. H03176'25).